Hawaii statutes.
[Chapter 556a]

UNIFORM
FIDUCIARY ACCESS TO DIGITAL ASSETS ACT

Section

556a-1
Short title

556a-2
Definitions

556a-3
Applicability

556a-4
User direction for disclosure of digital assets

556a-5
Terms-of-service agreement

556a-6
Procedure for disclosing digital assets

556a-7
Disclosure of content of electronic communications

of deceased user

556a-8
Disclosure of other digital assets of deceased user

556a-9
Disclosure of content of electronic communications

of principal

556a-10
Disclosure of other digital assets of principal

556a-11
Disclosure of digital assets held in trust when

trustee is original user

556a-12
Disclosure of contents of electronic communications

held in trust when trustee not original
user

556a-13
Disclosure of other digital assets held in trust

when trustee not original user

556a-14
Disclosure of digital assets to conservator of

protected person

556a-15
Fiduciary duty and authority

556a-16
Custodian compliance and immunity

556a-17
Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and

National Commerce Act

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next